Utah statutes.
72-10-209.   Acquisition of air rights -- Condemnation.

(1)  To provide unobstructed air space for the landing and taking off of aircraft using airports acquired or maintained under this chapter, the division and a county, municipality, or airport authority may acquire the air rights over private property necessary to insure safe approaches to the landing areas of the airports.

(2)  The air rights may be acquired by grant, purchase, lease, or condemnation in the same manner provided under Section 72-10-205 for the acquisition or expansion of airports.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

